Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-141
Department or agency; fees; rules and regulations.

The department or agency may charge a reasonable fee in an amount established by the department or agency in rules and regulations to recover expenses in carrying out sections 43-137 to 43-140. The department or agency shall use the fees to defray costs incurred to carry out such sections. The department or agency may waive the fee if the requesting party shows that the fee would work an undue financial hardship on the party.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out such sections.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 38;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 86.